src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_C_makizin_gt-norm.yaml
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+4: nimakiziniminaanin
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: nimakiziniminaaning
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: nimakiziniminaanig
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+4: gimakiziniminaanin
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: gimakiziniminaaning
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: gimakiziniminaanig
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+4: gimakizinimiwaan
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: gimakizinimiwaang
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: gimakizinimiwaag
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+3+4+4: omakiziniminiwa
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+3+4+Loc: omakiziniminiing
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+3+4+Pl: omakiziniminiwa
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+4: omakizinimiwaan
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: omakizinimiwaang
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: omakizinimiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt+4: nimakizinimibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt+Loc: nimakizinimibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt+Pl: nimakizinimibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt+4: gimakizinimibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt+Loc: gimakizinimibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt+Pl: gimakizinimibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt+4: omakizinimibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt+Loc: omakizinimibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt+Pl: omakizinimibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt+4: imakizinimibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt+Loc: imakizinimibaniing
     X+makizin+NI+Pos+Prt+Pl: imakizinimibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nimakizinishinaaniban
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimakizinishinaanidig
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gimakizinishinaaniban
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizinishinaanidig
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gimakizinishiwaaban
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizinishiwaadig
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt: omakizinishiniiban
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: omakizinishiniidin
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: omakizinishiwaaban
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omakizinishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+4: nimakizinishinaanin
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nimakizinishinaaning
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nimakizinishinaanig
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+4: gimakizinishinaanin
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gimakizinishinaaning
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gimakizinishinaanig
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+4: gimakizinishiwaan
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gimakizinishiwaang
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gimakizinishiwaag
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+3+4+4: omakizinishiniwa
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+3+4+Loc: omakizinishiniing
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+3+4+Pl: omakizinishiniwa
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+4: omakizinishiwaan
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: omakizinishiwaang
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: omakizinishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: nimakizinishibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: nimakizinishibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: nimakizinishibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: gimakizinishibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: gimakizinishibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: gimakizinishibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: omakizinishibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: omakizinishibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: omakizinishibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: imakizinishibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: imakizinishibaniing
     X+makizin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: imakizinishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+4: nimakizininaanibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nimakizininaanibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nimakizininaanibaniig
     1+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nimakizininaanidigan
     1+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nimakizininaanidiging
     1+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nimakizininaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizininaanibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizininaanibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizininaanibaniig
     2+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizininaanidigan
     2+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizininaanidiging
     2+makizin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizininaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimakiziniwaabaniin
     2+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakiziniwaabaniing
     2+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakiziniwaabaniig
     2+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakiziniwaadigan
     2+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakiziniwaadiging
     2+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakiziniwaadigag
     3+makizin+NI+3+4+Prt+4: omakizininiibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+3+4+Prt+Loc: omakizininiibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+3+4+Prt+Pl: omakizininiibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omakizininiidigan
     3+makizin+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizininiidiging
     3+makizin+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizininiidigan
     3+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Prt+4: omakiziniwaabaniin
     3+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omakiziniwaabaniing
     3+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omakiziniwaabaniig
     3+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omakiziniwaadigan
     3+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakiziniwaadiging
     3+makizin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakiziniwaadigag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: makizinenyishibaniin
     makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: makizinenyishibaniing
     makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: makizinenyishibaniin
     makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: makizinensishibaniin
     makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: makizinensishibaniing
     makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: makizinensishibaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nimakizinenyimishinaan
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nimakizinensimishinaan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gimakizinenyimishinaan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: gimakizinenyimishiwaa
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gimakizinensimishinaan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: gimakizinensimishiwaa
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4: omakizinenyimishini
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: omakizinenyimishiwaa
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4: omakizinensimishini
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: omakizinensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: nimakizinenyimishiban
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nimakizinenyimishidin
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: nimakizinensimishiban
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nimakizinensimishidin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: gimakizinenyimishiban
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gimakizinenyimishidin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: gimakizinensimishiban
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gimakizinensimishidin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: omakizinenyimishiban
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: omakizinenyimishidin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: omakizinensimishiban
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: omakizinensimishidin
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: imakizinenyimishiban
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: imakizinenyimishidin
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: imakizinensimishiban
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: imakizinensimishidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+4: nimakizinenyimishan
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nimakizinenyimishing
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: nimakizinenyimishan
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: nimakizinensimishan
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: nimakizinensimishing
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: nimakizinensimishan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+4: gimakizinenyimishan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: gimakizinenyimishing
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: gimakizinenyimishan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: gimakizinensimishan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: gimakizinensimishing
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: gimakizinensimishan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+4: omakizinenyimishan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: omakizinenyimishing
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: omakizinenyimishan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: omakizinensimishan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: omakizinensimishing
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: omakizinensimishan
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+4: imakizinenyimishan
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: imakizinenyimishing
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: imakizinenyimishan
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: imakizinensimishan
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: imakizinensimishing
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: imakizinensimishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: nimakizinenyiminaaniban
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimakizinenyiminaanidig
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: nimakizinensiminaaniban
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimakizinensiminaanidig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: gimakizinenyiminaaniban
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizinenyiminaanidig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: gimakizinenyimiwaaban
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizinenyimiwaadig
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: gimakizinensiminaaniban
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizinensiminaanidig
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: gimakizinensimiwaaban
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizinensimiwaadig
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+4+Prt: omakizinenyiminiiban
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl: omakizinenyiminiidin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: omakizinenyimiwaaban
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omakizinenyimiwaadig
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+4+Prt: omakizinensiminiiban
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl: omakizinensiminiidin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: omakizinensimiwaaban
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omakizinensimiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+4: nimakizinenyiminaanin
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: nimakizinenyiminaaning
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: nimakizinenyiminaanig
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+4: nimakizinensiminaanin
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: nimakizinensiminaaning
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: nimakizinensiminaanig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+4: gimakizinenyiminaanin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: gimakizinenyiminaaning
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: gimakizinenyiminaanig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+Pl+4: gimakizinenyimiwaan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: gimakizinenyimiwaang
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: gimakizinenyimiwaag
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+4: gimakizinensiminaanin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: gimakizinensiminaaning
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: gimakizinensiminaanig
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+4: gimakizinensimiwaan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: gimakizinensimiwaang
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: gimakizinensimiwaag
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+4+4: omakizinenyiminiwa
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+4+Loc: omakizinenyiminiing
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+4+Pl: omakizinenyiminiwa
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+Pl+4: omakizinenyimiwaan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: omakizinenyimiwaang
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: omakizinenyimiwaag
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+4+4: omakizinensiminiwa
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+4+Loc: omakizinensiminiing
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+4+Pl: omakizinensiminiwa
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+4: omakizinensimiwaan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: omakizinensimiwaang
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: omakizinensimiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Prt+4: nimakizinenyimibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Prt+Loc: nimakizinenyimibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Prt+Pl: nimakizinenyimibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Prt+4: nimakizinensimibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Prt+Loc: nimakizinensimibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Prt+Pl: nimakizinensimibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Prt+4: gimakizinenyimibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Prt+Loc: gimakizinenyimibaniing
